Utah statutes.
19-6-824.   Transfer of assets and liabilities from Waste Tire Recycling Industrial Assistance Loan Fund to restricted special revenue fund -- Administration of outstanding loans.

(1)  The assets and liabilities of the Waste Tire Recycling Industrial Assistance Loan Fund shall be transferred to the restricted special revenue fund.

(2)  The Division of Finance shall account for and track any outstanding loans made under the Waste Tire Recycling Industrial Assistance Loan Program.

(3) (a)  The Governor's Office of Economic Development shall administer the collection of any outstanding loans made under the Waste Tire Recycling Industrial Assistance Loan Program.

(b)  Any loan repayments shall be deposited in the fund.

